District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-301.72

Hack stands — Adjoining railroad stations; rates of charges.

Repealed.

History

June 7, 1898, 30 Stat. 747, Res. No. 46
Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 22(c), 33 DCR 703

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-313.
1973 Ed., § 1-222.